nb: Støttet skannemedietype: Kunst; Film; Storformatspapir; Negativer; Reflekterende utskrifter; Sklier; Transparenter; Annet
fr: Type de support de numérisation pris en charge: Œuvres d’art; Film; Papier grand format; Négatifs; Tirages réfléchissants; Toboggans; Transparents; Autre
el: Υποστηριζόμενος τύπος μέσων σάρωσης: Έργο τέχνης; Ταινία; Χαρτί μεγάλου μεγέθους; Αρνητικά; Ανακλαστικές εκτυπώσεις; Τσουλήθρες; Διαφάνειες; Άλλο
zh-CN: 支持的扫描介质类型: 艺术品; 薄膜; 大幅面纸张; 底片; 反射式照片; 滑梯; 幻灯片; 其他
ko: 지원 스캔 미디어 유형: 아트워크; 필름; 대형 용지; 네거티브; 반사형 인화; 미끄럼틀; 슬라이드; 기타
bg-BG: Поддържан тип мултимедия за сканиране: Произведения на изкуството; Филм; Широкоформатна хартия; Негативи; Отразяващи отпечатъци; Пързалки; Прозрачно прожекционно фолио; Други
hu: Támogatott szkennelési médiatípus: Műalkotás; Film; Nagyformátumú papír; Negatívok; Fényvisszaverő nyomatok; Csúszdák; Átlátszó fóliák; Egyéb
tr: Desteklenen tarama ortam tipi: Sanatsal Çalışmalar; Film; Büyük format kağıt; Negatifler; Yansıtıcı baskılar; Kaydıraklar; Tepegöz Saydamları; Diğer
en: Supported scan media type: Artwork; Film; Large format paper; Negatives; Reflective prints; Slides; Transparencies; Other
hr-HR: Podržana vrsta medija za skeniranje: Umjetnina; Film; Papir velikog formata; Negativi; Reflektirajući otisci; Tobogani; Grafoskopi; Ostalo
zh-TW: 支援的掃描媒體類型: 藝術品; 膠片; 大尺寸紙張; 負片; 反射式印刷品; 滑梯; 透明膠片/投影片; 其他
cs: Podporovaný typ skenovaného média: Výtvarné umění; Film; Velkoformátový papír; Negativy; Reflexní tisky; Skluzavky; Fólie; Jiné
ja: サポートされるスキャンメディアタイプ: 美術品; フィルム; 大判用紙; ネガ; 反射プリント; すべり台; OHPフィルム; その他
pl: Obsługiwany typ nośnika skanowania: Szata graficzna; Folia; Papier wielkoformatowy; Negatywy; Wydruki odbiciowe; Zjeżdżalnie; Foliogramy; Inne
sl-SI: Podprti tip medija za skeniranje: Umetnine; Film; Papir velikega formata; Negativi; Odsevni odtisi; Tobogani; Prosojnice; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip media de scanare suportat: Operă de artă; Folie; Hârtie de format mare; Negative; Printuri reflectorizante; Tobogane; Folii transparente; Altele
es: Tipo de medio de escaneo admitido: Obras de arte; Película; Papel de gran formato; Negativos; Impresiones reflectantes; Toboganes; Transparencias; Otros
pt-PT: Tipo de originais suportados: Trabalhos artísticos; Película; Papel de grande formato; Negativos; Impressões reflexivas; Escorregas; Acetatos; Outro
th: ประเภทสื่อสแกนที่รองรับ: อาร์ตเวิร์ก; ฟิล์ม; กระดาษขนาดใหญ่; ฟิล์มเนกาทีฟ; ภาพพิมพ์แบบสะท้อนแสง; กระดานลื่น; แผ่นใส; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de mídia de digitalização suportada: Obra de arte; Película; Papel de grande formato; Negativos; Impressões reflexivas; Escorregadores; Transparências; Outro
sk-SK: Podporovaný typ skenovacieho média: Umelecké dielo; Film; Veľkoformátový papier; Negatívy; Reflexné tlače; Šmýkačky; Priehľadné fólie; Iné
nl: Ondersteund scanmediatype: Kunst; Film; Grootformaatpapier; Negatieven; Reflecterende afdrukken; Glijbaan; Transparanten; Andere
vi: Loại phương tiện quét được hỗ trợ: Tác phẩm nghệ thuật; Màng; Giấy khổ lớn; Phim âm bản; Bản in phản quang; Cầu trượt; Giấy bóng kính; Khác
da: Understøttet scanningsmedie-type: Illustrationer; Film; Storformatpapir; Negativer; Reflekterende print; Rutsjebaner; Transparenter; Andet
de: Unterstützter Scanmedientyp: Kunst; Film; Großformatpapier; Negative; Reflektierende Drucke; Rutschen; Folien; Sonstiges
ru: Поддерживаемый тип носителя сканирования: Произведения искусства; Пленка; Широкоформатная бумага; Негативы; Отражающие отпечатки; Горки; Прозрачные листы; Другой
it: Tipo di supporto di scansione supportato: Arte; Pellicola; Carta grande formato; Negativi; Stampe riflettenti; Piani inclinati; Lucidi; Altro
sv: Listar vilka typer av original som skannern kan hantera (t.ex. olika filmtyper, reflekterande tryck): Bildmaterial; Film; Storformatspapper; Negativ; Reflekterande utskrifter; Rutschkanor; OH-apparater; Övrigt
fi: Tuettu skannausmedian tyyppi: Taide; Filmi; Suurformaattipaperi; Negatiivit; Heijastumatulosteet; Liukumäet; Piirtoheitinkalvot; Muu
lt-LT: Palaikomas skenavimo laikmenos tipas: Meno kūrinys; Plėvelė; Didelio formato popierius; Negatyvai; Atspindintys atspaudai; Čiuožyklos; Skaidrės; Kita